Illinois, session 104th, SB2065.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-101 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-101 new)7    Sec. 22-101. Denial of free education prohibited. 8    (a) The General Assembly finds that:9        (1) In June 1982, the United States Supreme Court 10    issued Plyler v. Doe (457 U.S. 202), a landmark decision 11    that held that it is unconstitutional for states to deny 12    children a free public education based on immigration 13    status. The Supreme Court found that any resources that 14    might be saved from excluding undocumented children from 15    public schools were far outweighed by the harms imposed on 16    society at large from denying these children an education.17        (2) For more than 40 years, Plyler v. Doe has ensured 18    equal access to education for children regardless of 19    immigration status, but anti-immigrant sentiment continues 20    to threaten that right.21        (3) A positive and healthy school climate is one in 22    which children, educators, and staff feel safe, welcomed, 23    supported, and connected. In an effort to create a   SB2065- 2 -LRB104 10774 LNS 20854 b1    positive school climate, State schools must take steps to 2    protect the integrity of school learning environments for 3    all children.4        (4) Anti-immigrant rhetoric and threats directed at 5    immigrants, in the public forum and directed at 6    individuals, chills and discourages parents from enrolling 7    their children in schools to access the education that 8    they are entitled to.9        (5) With risks of changes to approaches to immigration 10    policies and enforcement at the federal level, it is more 11    important than ever for the State to work to protect 12    children and ensure that, regardless of their immigration 13    status, they may continue to take advantage of the 14    education to which they are entitled, free from 15    intimidation or risk of a loss of access to resources and 16    programs that other students enjoy, consistent with Plyler 17    v. Doe as in effect on January 1, 2025.18    (b) As used in this Section:19    "Citizenship or immigration status" means all matters 20regarding citizenship of the United States or any other 21country or the authority, or lack thereof, to reside in or 22otherwise to be present in the United States, including an 23individual's nationality and country of citizenship.24    "Civil immigration warrant" has the same meaning given in 25Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act.26    "Immigration agent" has the same meaning given in Section   SB2065- 3 -LRB104 10774 LNS 20854 b110 of the Illinois TRUST Act.2    "Immigration detainer" has the same meaning given in 3Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act.4    "Prevailing party" includes any party:5        (1) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 6    through a judicial judgment in his or her favor;7        (2) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 8    through any settlement agreement approved by the court; or9        (3) whose pursuit of a non-frivolous claim was a 10    catalyst for a unilateral change in position by the 11    opposing party relative to the relief sought.12    "School" means every public school, school district, and 13governing body, including special charter district and charter 14schools, organized under this Code, and their agents, 15including contracted parties.16    (c) No child may be denied a free public education through 17secondary school while in this State based on the child's or 18associated person's perceived or actual citizenship or 19immigration status.20        (1) A school must not exclude a child, or associated 21    person, from participation in or deny a child, or 22    associated person, the benefits of any program or activity 23    on the grounds of that child's, or associated person's, 24    actual or perceived citizenship or immigration status.25        (2) A school must not use criteria, measures, or 26    methods of administration that have the effect of   SB2065- 4 -LRB104 10774 LNS 20854 b1    excluding from participation or denying the benefits of 2    any program or activity because of a child's, or 3    associated person's, actual or perceived immigration 4    status. These criteria, measures, or methods of 5    administration include:6            (A) requesting or collecting information or 7        documentation about citizenship or immigration status 8        unless required by State or federal law; and9            (B) designating immigration status, citizenship, 10        place of birth, nationality, or national origin as 11        directory information.12        (3) A school must not threaten to disclose information 13    regarding or relating to the actual or perceived 14    citizenship or immigration status of a child, or 15    associated person, or actually disclose information based 16    on perceived or unverified citizenship or immigration 17    status, to any other person, entity, or any immigration or 18    law enforcement agency.19        (4) A school must not allow an immigration agent to 20    enter a school site or school district facility for any 21    purpose without providing valid identification, a written 22    statement of purpose, and a valid judicial warrant, and, 23    to the extent possible, receiving approval from the 24    superintendent of the school district or their designee, 25    or the principal of the charter school or their designee, 26    and their legal counsel, as applicable. A school district   SB2065- 5 -LRB104 10774 LNS 20854 b1    or school, whether public or charter, must not detain any 2    individual solely on the basis of any formal or informal 3    request, or immigration detainer or civil immigration 4    warrant from an immigration agent.5            (A) An immigration agent that presents only a 6        civil immigration warrant must be denied entry unless 7        the immigration agent declares and supports the 8        existence of exigent circumstances.9            (B) If an immigration agent provides a judicial 10        warrant, a school district or school, whether public 11        or charter, shall:12                (i) make every feasible effort to contact the 13            school's legal counsel, review the judicial 14            warrant, and challenge the judicial warrant if it 15            is determined a challenge may be brought; and16                (ii) the Attorney General shall represent the 17            school corporation in any cause of action brought 18            by the school district to challenge a judicial 19            warrant presented by an immigration agent to enter 20            a school site or school district facility.21    (d) A school district or school, whether public or 22charter, shall adopt a policy for complying with paragraphs 23(1), (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (c).24    (e) Any party aggrieved by conduct that violates 25subsection (c) may bring a civil lawsuit. This lawsuit must be 26brought not later than 2 years after the violation of   SB2065- 6 -LRB104 10774 LNS 20854 b1subsection (c). If the court finds that a violation of 2paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subsection (c) has 3occurred, the court may award to the plaintiff 3 times actual 4damages or $17,000, whichever is greater. The court, as it 5deems appropriate, may grant as relief any permanent or 6preliminary negative or mandatory injunction, temporary 7restraining order, or other order.8    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 9an exhaustion of the administrative complaint process before 10civil law remedies may be pursued.11    (g) Upon motion, a court shall award reasonable attorney's 12fees and costs, including expert witness fees and other 13litigation expenses, to a plaintiff who is a prevailing party 14in any action brought under subsection (c). In awarding 15reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall consider the 16degree to which the relief obtained relates to the relief 17sought.18    (h) The General Assembly finds and declares that this 19Section is a State law within the meaning of subsection (d) of 20Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.